Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 5

Council of Juvenile and Family Court Judges

37-1-501. Creation and membership of council.

There is created the Tennessee council of juvenile and family court judges, which shall be the official organization of the judges having juvenile and family court jurisdiction in this state.

The membership of the council shall consist of all judges of juvenile courts in this state.

Acts 1972, ch. 833, § 1; 1983, ch. 131, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-278.

Cross-References. Representatives of council of juvenile and family court judges as ex officio members of child sexual abuse task force, §37-1-603.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

37-1-502. Rules, regulations and by-laws — Officers — Recommending rules to supreme court — Development of plan to establish demonstration sites.

The council is authorized to adopt and, from time to time, amend such rules, regulations or bylaws as it considers necessary for the conduct of its affairs.

Such rules, regulations or bylaws may provide for such officers as the council considers advisable, for the method of selection of such officers, for the selection of a time and place within this state for annual meetings of the council, and for such other matters consistent with the general laws of the state as the council may choose.

The council shall make recommendations to the supreme court as to rules governing the practice and procedure in juvenile courts of this state. The supreme court may consider the council's recommendations in prescribing rules as provided in § 16-3-402.

Prior to submitting its recommended rules to the supreme court, the council shall send a draft of its recommendation to the commission on children and youth. The commission shall distribute the draft to state agencies that, in the commission's opinion, may be affected by the recommended rules, and the commission will be responsible for accumulating and transmitting the comments of such agencies promptly to the council, so that the comments can be taken into account by the council in an orderly manner when preparing its final proposal of rules to be submitted to the supreme court. Thereafter, the commission shall present such accumulated comments to the court in such manner as the court may provide for receiving comment upon the proposed rules.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the council shall assist the council on children's mental health care in developing a plan that will establish demonstration sites in certain geographic areas where children's mental health care is child-centered, family-driven, and culturally and linguistically competent and that provides a coordinated system of care for children's mental health needs in this state.

Acts 1972, ch. 833, § 2; 1982, ch. 790, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-279; Acts 2008, ch. 1062, § 7.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act regarding to the mental health needs of Tennessee's children and youth, please refer to Acts 2008, ch. 1062.

37-1-503. Executive secretary of council.

The president of the council, with the approval of a majority of the executive committee, shall appoint an executive secretary, a staff attorney and such other personnel as may be necessary to conduct its affairs, whose specific duties and responsibilities shall be as prescribed by the council in its rules, regulations or bylaws.

Acts 1982, ch. 937, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-282; Acts 1998, ch. 892, § 1.

37-1-504. Annual meeting — Subject matter.

The council shall meet annually for the consideration of any and all matters pertaining to the discharge of the official duties and obligations of its members, to the end that there shall be a more efficient and prompt administration of justice in the juvenile courts of this state, and to the end that the causes of dependency, neglect and delinquency of juveniles be consistently better understood and dealt with through the use of all available sources, including the resources of the departments of education, mental health and substance abuse services, intellectual and developmental disability, and children's services.

It is the legislative intent and direction that the council actively pursue the ends and purposes set out in this section.

Acts 1972, ch. 833, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 219, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1975, ch. 248, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-280; Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; imp. am. Acts 2000, ch. 947, § 6; 2010, ch. 1100, § 52; 2012, ch. 575, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2010, ch. 1100, § 153 provided that the commissioner of mental health and developmental disabilities, the commissioner of mental health, the commissioner of intellectual and developmental disabilities, and the commissioner of finance and administration are authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of the act. All such rules and regulations shall be promulgated in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

37-1-505. Annual meeting — Expenses.

It is the official duty of each member of the council to attend upon its meetings unless otherwise officially engaged, or for other good and sufficient reasons.

Each member who attends the annual meeting or training sessions shall be compensated for the member's actual and reasonable expenses in attending such meeting or training sessions. Unless such funds are provided by the state, such expenses shall be paid upon a verified statement of expenses being filed with the county mayor by any member incurring such expenses. Expenses shall be paid by the trustee upon warrant of the county mayor from the general fund of the county in which the member serves as judge; provided, that funds for such purpose have been appropriated by the county legislative body.

Acts 1972, ch. 833, § 4; 1982, ch. 937, §§ 2, 3; 1983, ch. 387, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-281; Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2, directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

37-1-506. Report and publishing of juvenile court information, including cases, informal adjustments, pretrial diversions and identifying information — Expungement of child's information upon order of expunction of charge that had resulted in probation or prevention services.

The clerk of each juvenile court shall, each month, report to the executive secretary such information as the council may require concerning cases handled by such court, including, but not limited to, informal adjustments, appointment of counsel, pretrial diversions, and all other dispositions made by the court. Notwithstanding § 37-1-153 or any other law to the contrary, the council may require identifying information to be reported in order that the council may more accurately track recidivism rates and other pertinent trends relating to juveniles. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, identifying information received by the council shall be confidential; shall not be published, released, or otherwise disseminated; and shall be maintained in accordance with state and federal laws and regulations regarding confidentiality. The council shall publish data and make such data available to properly concerned agencies and individuals, or to any person upon request. Any such publication or release of data shall be limited to nonidentifying information. The council shall develop guidelines and procedures to expunge identifying information collected on juveniles; provided, that such expunction shall occur only after the juvenile reaches the age that is beyond jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

On or before September 1 of each year, the clerk of each juvenile court operating county probation programs shall furnish to the department the names and birthdates of all children receiving county probation services, and the length of probation for each child. Upon receipt of an order of expunction of the charge for which the child was placed on county probation, the department shall expunge that child's information from its records.

On or before September 1 of each year, the clerk of each juvenile court receiving prevention grants or other prevention funding through the department shall furnish to the department the names and birthdates of all children receiving prevention services, the amount of time each child was provided services, and the percentage of prevention services provided that are evidence-based for the previous fiscal year. Upon receipt of an order of expunction of the charge for which the child received prevention services, the department shall expunge that child's information from its records.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2), nothing in this section shall be construed to mandate any change in a county's decision regarding the division of reporting responsibility between the juvenile court clerk and the youth services officer or any other juvenile court staff member.

Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, in counties with a youth services officer, the youth services officer shall be responsible for furnishing the information to the department required by subsections (b) and (c).

Acts 1982, ch. 937, § 1; T.C.A., § 37-283; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, § 19; 1999, ch. 264, §§ 1, 2; 2016, ch. 1005, § 2; 2017, ch. 140, § 1; 2018, ch. 1052, § 52.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment added (b) and (c); and redesignated former (b) as present (d).

The 2017 amendment added (d)(2); and, in (d)(1), added “Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2),” at the beginning and added “or any other juvenile court staff member” at the end.

The 2018 amendment, in (a), inserted “appointment of counsel,”, substituted “shall” for “may” preceding “publish data”, and substituted “nonidentifying” for “non-identifying” following “shall be limited to”.

Effective Dates. Act 2016, ch. 1005, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2017, ch. 140, § 2. July 1, 2017.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

37-1-507. Program to reimburse counties for costs of inpatient mental health evaluations, examinations and detention of juveniles charged as adults — Rules and regulations.

The council of juvenile and family court judges is authorized to establish and administer a program to reimburse counties for the costs associated with inpatient mental health evaluations and examinations conducted on juveniles charged with an offense which would constitute a felony if committed by an adult. Such a program is subject to available state funding and may include full or partial reimbursements to counties for the costs of inpatient mental health examinations or evaluations ordered by a juvenile court judge, as well as the costs of transportation of the child for a mental health examination or evaluation. The program may also include reimbursement to counties for costs of detention incurred pursuant to § 37-1-116(f) for the purposes of obtaining an outpatient evaluation or examination at a detention facility located in another county.

The council may adopt rules and regulations governing such a reimbursement program pursuant to § 37-1-502.

Acts 2009, ch. 593, § 1.